Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-484.03
Operators' licenses; state identification
cards; department; retain copies of source documents.

The
department shall retain copies of source documents presented by all individuals
applying for or holding operators' licenses or state identification cards.
Copies retained by the department shall be held in secured storage and managed
to meet the requirements of the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act
and sections 60-484, 60-484.02, and 60-4,144.

Laws 2011, LB215, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 11.

Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act, see section 60-2901.